apertium-ces-ces.ces_han.dix
    <pardef n="BASE__žádné">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>á</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>yho</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>yho</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>yho</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éch</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éch</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éch</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éch</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ymô</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ymô</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ymô</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ém</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ém</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ém</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ém</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>yho</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ó</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>á</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>á</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>á</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ém</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ém</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ém</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éch</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éch</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éch</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éch</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ém</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ém</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ém</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ó</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éma</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éma</l>
        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éma</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éma</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="žádn/é__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>é<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__žádné"/>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="žádn/é__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>é<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__žádné"/>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="žádné"><i>žádn</i><par n="žádn/é__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="žádné"><i>žádn</i><par n="žádn/é__det"/></e>
